Utah statutes.
6-1-20.   Right to prefer creditor.
Nothing in this title contained shall affect the power of a person, although
insolvent, residing either within or without this state, to transfer property
in this state in good faith to a particular creditor for the purpose of paying
or securing the whole or a part of a debt owing to such creditor; provided,
that joint, or joint and several, debtors can prefer their joint creditors
only out of joint property, and can prefer the individual creditors of each
only out of the separate property of each.
